Wisconsin, session 2025, SB136.
do enact as follows:SB136,13Section 1. 347.26 (4) (a) of the statutes is amended to read:SB136,1,74347.26 (4) (a) Any Except as provided in par. (am), any motor vehicle may be 5equipped with not more than 2 back-up lamps which shall be so directed as to 6project a white or amber light illuminating the roadway to the rear of such vehicle 7for a distance not to exceed 75 feet.SB136,21Section 2. 347.26 (4) (am) of the statutes is created to read:SB136,2,52347.26 (4) (am) In addition to the lamps authorized under par. (a), a school 3bus may be equipped with one back-up lamp mounted to each side of the vehicle and 4directed to project a white or amber light illuminating the rear wheels of the vehicle 5when backing.SB136,2,66